District of Columbia statutes.
2-223.05

Election of remedies.

(a)

The institution of a civil action pursuant to § 2-223.03(a) shall preclude an employee from pursuing any administrative remedy for the same cause of action from an arbitrator pursuant to a negotiated grievance and arbitration procedure or an employment contract.

(b)

No civil action shall be brought, pursuant to § 2-223.03(a) if the aggrieved employee has had a final determination on the same cause of action from an arbitrator pursuant to a negotiated grievance and arbitration procedure or an employment contract.

Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 206, 45 DCR 5147

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1177.5.

Prior Codifications

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 2-223.01.

Emergency Legislation